Illinois, session 104th, HB3521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5adding Section 5-401.7 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-401.7 new)7    Sec. 5-401.7. Inadmissibility of unreliable statements by 8defendants. 9    (a) In this Section:10    "Custodial interrogation" means any interrogation (i) 11during which a reasonable person in the subject's position 12would consider himself or herself to be in custody and (ii) 13during which a question is asked that is reasonably likely to 14elicit an incriminating response.15    "Place of detention" means a building or a police station 16that is a place of operation for a municipal police department 17or county sheriff's department or other law enforcement agency 18at which persons are or may be held in detention in connection 19with criminal charges against those persons or allegations 20that those persons are delinquent minors. 21    (b) Unreliable statements to law enforcement made during a 22custodial interrogation conducted at a police station or other 23place of detention by a defendant are inadmissible at trial in   HB3521- 2 -LRB104 10283 RLC 20357 b1any criminal court proceeding or juvenile court proceeding for 2the prosecution of a homicide.3    (c) In any proceeding under this Section, the prosecution 4shall timely disclose prior to any relevant evidentiary 5hearing or trial its intent to introduce a statement made 6during a custodial interrogation conducted at a place of 7detention. At that time, the prosecution must tender any 8electronic recordings of the statement and any documents 9relating to the circumstances under which the statement was 10obtained and any other evidence the State intends to rely upon 11to determine the statement's reliability.12    (d) Before trial, a defendant may move to exclude a 13statement alleged to be unreliable. The defendant shall 14specifically identify the statement or statements alleged to 15be unreliable.16    (e) At the hearing, it shall be the burden of the 17prosecutor to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that 18the statement is reliable.19    (f) When deciding a statement's reliability, a court 20should consider:21        (1) whether the details in the statement fit with the 22    evidence known before the interrogation, especially 23    details that describe unusual or not easily guessed facts 24    of the crime that had not been made public;25        (2) whether the statement provides any new details or 26    any new evidence not known before the interrogation that   HB3521- 3 -LRB104 10283 RLC 20357 b1    can be independently corroborated after the interrogation;2        (3) whether facts of the crime were disclosed to the 3    defendant rather than originated with the defendant;4        (4) whether the defendant recanted the defendant's 5    statement at any time and the circumstances of that 6    recantation;7        (5) whether the statement was electronically recorded; 8    and9        (6) any other information relevant to the reliability 10    of the statement. 11    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 12amended by adding Section 103-2.3 as follows: 13    (725 ILCS 5/103-2.3 new)14    Sec. 103-2.3. Inadmissibility of unreliable statements by 15defendants.16    (a) In this Section:17    "Custodial interrogation" means any interrogation (i) 18during which a reasonable person in the subject's position 19would consider himself or herself to be in custody and (ii) 20during which a question is asked that is reasonably likely to 21elicit an incriminating response.22    "Place of detention" means a building or a police station 23that is a place of operation for a municipal police department 24or county sheriff's department or other law enforcement agency   HB3521- 4 -LRB104 10283 RLC 20357 b1at which persons are or may be held in detention in connection 2with criminal charges against those persons or allegations 3that those persons are delinquent minors. 4    (b) Unreliable statements to law enforcement made during a 5custodial interrogation conducted at a police station or other 6place of detention by a defendant are inadmissible at trial in 7any criminal court proceeding or juvenile court proceeding for 8the prosecution of a homicide.9    (c) In any proceeding under this Section, the prosecution 10shall timely disclose prior to any relevant evidentiary 11hearing or trial its intent to introduce a statement made 12during a custodial interrogation conducted at a place of 13detention. At that time, the prosecution must tender any 14electronic recordings of the statement and any documents 15relating to the circumstances under which the statement was 16obtained and any other evidence the State intends to rely upon 17to determine the statement's reliability.18    (d) Before trial, a defendant may move to exclude a 19statement alleged to be unreliable. The defendant shall 20specifically identify the statement or statements alleged to 21be unreliable.22    (e) At the hearing, it shall be the burden of the 23prosecutor to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that 24the statement is reliable.25    (f) When deciding a statement's reliability, a court 26should consider:  HB3521- 5 -LRB104 10283 RLC 20357 b1        (1) whether the details in the statement fit with the 2    evidence known before the interrogation, especially 3    details that describe unusual or not easily guessed facts 4    of the crime that had not been made public;5        (2) whether the statement provides any new details or 6    any new evidence not known before the interrogation that 7    can be independently corroborated after the interrogation;8        (3) whether facts of the crime were disclosed to the 9    defendant rather than originated with the defendant;10        (4) whether the defendant recanted the defendant's 11    statement at any time and the circumstances of that 12    recantation;13        (5) whether the statement was electronically recorded; 14    and 15        (6) any other information relevant to the reliability 16    of the statement.